Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.400

Mobile homes, recreational or commercial vehicles—Meeting standards of other states at least equal to this state.

If the director of the department of labor and industries determines that the standards for body and frame design, construction and the plumbing, heating and electrical equipment installed in mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers by the statutes or rules and regulations of other states are at least equal to the standards prescribed by this state, he or she may so provide by regulation. Any mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer which a state listed in such regulations has approved as meeting its standards for body and frame design, construction and plumbing, heating and electrical equipment shall be deemed to meet the standards of the director of the department of labor and industries, if he or she determines that the standards of such state are actually being enforced.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5101; 1995 c 280 s 11; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 7; 1967 c 157 s 7.]